Washington statutes.
RCW 36.43.010

Authority to adopt.

(1) The boards of county commissioners may adopt standard building codes and standard fire regulations to be applied within their respective jurisdictions.

(2) The boards of county commissioners may eliminate the minimum gross floor area requirements for single-family detached dwellings or reduce the requirements below the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code.

[ 2018 c 302 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.43.010. Prior: 1943 c 204 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4077-10.]